Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1101.
do enact as follows:AB1101,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1101,29Section 2. 20.255 (2) (ch) of the statutes is created to read:AB1101,2,121020.255 (2) (ch) Grow your own programs; teacher pipeline capacity building. 11The amounts in the schedule for grants under s. 115.422 to school boards and 12operators of a charter school under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x).AB1101,313Section 3. 115.422 of the statutes is created to read:AB1101,2,2114115.422 Grow your own programs; teacher pipeline capacity 15building. (1) In this section, “grow your own program” means a program to 16encourage individuals to pursue a career in teaching or to facilitate teacher 17licensure. “Grow your own program” includes high school clubs that encourage 18careers in teaching, payment of costs associated with current staff acquiring 19education needed for licensure, support for career pathways using dual enrollment, 20support for partnerships focused on attracting or developing new teachers, or 21incentives for paraprofessionals to gain licensure.AB1101,3,322(2) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, from the appropriation under s. 120.255 (2) (ch), the department shall award grants to school boards and operators of 2a charter school under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x) to reimburse the school board or 3operator of the charter school for costs associated with grow your own programs.AB1101,3,54(3) The department shall promulgate rules to implement and administer this 5section, including criteria for awarding a grant.AB1101,46Section 4. 118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 7Act 15, is amended to read:AB1101,3,138118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. Add the amounts appropriated in the current fiscal year 9under s. 20.255 (2), except s. 20.255 (2) (ac), (aw), (az), (bb), (ch), (dj), (du), (fc), (fm), 10(fp), (fq), (fr), (fu), (k), and (m); and s. 20.505 (4) (es); and the amount, as determined 11by the secretary of administration, of the appropriation under s. 20.505 (4) (s) 12allocated for payments to telecommunications providers under contracts with 13school districts and cooperative educational service agencies under s. 16.971 (13).AB1101,514Section 5. 119.04 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1101,4,415119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 1666.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 17115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 18115.422, 115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 19118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 20118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 21118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.258, 118.291, 22118.292, 118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 23118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), and (15) to (27), 120.125, 24120.13 (1), (2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 1120.137, 120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city 2school district and board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the 3terms of a contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an 4opportunity schools and partnership program.AB1101,4,55